Utah statutes.
53-3-604.   Text of compact -- Party states to report traffic violations and
exchange driving record information in home state of driver.


DRIVERS' LICENSE COMPACT
ARTICLE I
Findings and Declaration of Policy
(1)  The party states find that:
(a)  The safety of their streets and highways is materially affected by the
degree of compliance with state and local ordinances relating to the operation
of motor vehicles.
(b)  Violation of a law or ordinance relating to the operation of motor
vehicles is evidence that the violator engages in conduct that is likely to
endanger the safety of persons and property.
(c)  A license to drive is predicated upon compliance with laws and ordinances
relating to the operation of motor vehicles, in whichever jurisdiction the
vehicle is operated.
(2)  It is the policy of each of the party states to:
(a)  promote compliance with the laws, ordinances, and administrative rules
and regulations relating to the operation of motor vehicles by their operators
in each of the jurisdictions where  the operators drive motor vehicles; and
(b)  make the reciprocal recognition of licenses to drive and eligibility for
licenses more just and equitable by considering the over-all compliance with
motor vehicle laws, ordinances, and administrative rules and regulations as a
condition precedent to renewing a license authorizing or  permitting operation
of a motor vehicle in any of the party states.
ARTICLE II
Definitions
As used in this compact:
(1)  "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the
District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.
(2)  "Home state" means the state that has issued and has the power to suspend
or revoke the use of the license or permit to operate a motor vehicle.
(3)  "Conviction" means a conviction of any offense related to the use or
operation of a motor vehicle that is prohibited by state law, municipal
ordinance, or administrative rule or regulation, or a forfeiture of bail,
bond, or other security deposited to secure appearance by a person charged
with having committed any offense, and which conviction or forfeiture is
required to be reported to the licensing authority.
ARTICLE III
Reports of Conviction
(1)  The licensing authority of a party state shall report each conviction of
a person from another party state occurring within its jurisdiction to the
licensing authority of the home state of the licensee.
(2)  The report shall clearly:
(a)  identify the person convicted;
(b)  describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code, or
ordinance violated;
(c)  identify the court in which action was taken;
(d)  indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered, or the
conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond, or other security;
and
(e)  include any special findings made in connection with the conviction.
ARTICLE IV
Effect of Conviction
(1)  The licensing authority in the home state, for the purposes of
suspension, revocation, or limitation of the license to operate a motor
vehicle, shall give the same effect to the conduct reported, pursuant to
Article III of this compact, as it would if the conduct had occurred in the
home state, in the case of convictions for:
(a)  manslaughter or negligent homicide resulting from the operation of a
motor vehicle;
(b)  driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug to a degree that
renders the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;
(c)  any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used; and
(d)  failure to stop and render aid in the event of a motor vehicle accident
resulting in the death or personal injury of another.
(2)  As to other convictions, reported pursuant to Article III, the licensing
authority in the home state shall give the same effect to the conduct as
provided by laws of the home state.
(3)  If the laws of a party state do not provide for offenses or violations
denominated or described in precisely the words employed in Subsection (1) of
this article, the party state shall construe the denominations and
descriptions appearing in Subsection (1) as  applying to and identifying those
offenses or violations of a substantially similar nature and the laws of the
party state shall contain provisions as necessary to ensure that full force
and effect is given in this article.
ARTICLE V
Applications for New Licenses
(1)  Upon application for a license to drive, the licensing authority in a
party state shall ascertain whether the applicant has ever held, or is the
holder of a license to drive issued by any other party state.
(2)  The licensing authority in the state where application is made shall not
issue a license to drive to the applicant if the applicant:
(a)  has held a license, but the license has been suspended by reason, in
whole or in part, of a violation and if the suspension period has not
terminated;
(b)  has held a license, but the license has been revoked by reason, in whole
or in part, of a violation and if the revocation has not terminated, except
that after the expiration of one year from the date the license was revoked,
the person may make application for a new license if permitted by law, which
the authority may refuse to issue if, after investigation, the licensing
authority determines that it will not be safe to grant to the person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways; or
(c)  is the holder of a license to drive issued by another party state and
currently in force unless the applicant surrenders the license.
ARTICLE VI
Applicability of Other Laws
Except as expressly required by this compact, nothing in this part affects the
right of any party state to apply any of its other laws relating to licenses
to drive to any person or circumstance, or invalidates or prevents any driver
license agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a
nonparty state.
ARTICLE VII
Compact Administrator and Interchange of Information
(1) (a)  The head of the licensing authority of each party state is the
administrator of this compact for his state.
(b)  The administrators, acting jointly have the power to formulate all
necessary and proper procedures for the exchange of information under this
compact.
(2)  The administrator of each party state shall furnish to the administrator
of each other party state any information or documents reasonably necessary to
facilitate the administration of this compact.
ARTICLE VIII
Entry into Force and Withdrawal
(1)  This compact shall enter into force and become effective as to any state
when it has enacted the compact into law.
(2)  Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the compact, but no withdrawal takes effect until six months after
the executive head of the withdrawing state has given notice of the withdrawal
to the executive heads of all other party states.
(3)  A withdrawal may not affect the validity or applicability by the
licensing authorities of states remaining party to the compact of any report
of conviction occurring prior to the withdrawal.
ARTICLE IX
Construction and Severability
(1)  This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes of
the compact.
(2)  The provisions of this compact are severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the
constitution of any party state or of the United States or the applicability
of the compact to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held
invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is not  affected by
the holding.
(3)  If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of any party state,
the compact remains in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in
full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.
